Massachusetts, session 194th, H1260.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 100A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 14 the following section:-  
Section 15. The commissioner of insurance shall set the minimum hourly labor rate that 
insurers shall pay on insured claims for repairs made by registered motor vehicle repair shops.   
In determining the minimum rate paid by insurers on all Massachusetts insured motor 
vehicle damage claims, the compensation for the minimum hourly labor rate that insurers shall 
pay on insured claims for repairs made by registered motor vehicle repair shops shall be 
calculated by utilizing the method described in this section.  

of 2 9   The compensation for the minimum hourly labor rate that insurers shall pay on insured 
claims for repairs made by registered motor vehicle repair shops shall be established by the 
repair shop submitting to the insurer 100 sequential customer-paid collision repair orders or 60 
consecutive days of customer-paid collision repair orders, whichever is less, from which the 
repairer shall calculate the average customer paid hourly labor rate, which shall be declared the 
minimum hourly labor rate that the insurer will pay to the repairer. The minimum hourly labor 
rate shall go into effect 30 days following the declaration, subject to audit of the submitted 
collision repair orders by the insurer and a rebuttal of the declared rate. If the declared rate is 
rebutted, the insurer shall propose an adjustment of the minimum hourly labor rate based on the 
rebuttal not later than 30 days after submission. If the repairer does not agree with the minimum 
hourly labor rate proposed by the insurer, the repairer may file an action with the commissioner 
of insurance 30 days after receipt of the proposal by the insurer. In an action commenced under 
this section, the insurer shall have the burden of proving that the rate declared by the repairer was 
inaccurate or unreasonable.  
SECTION 2. Section 113B of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “commissioner” in line 14, the 
following:- “; provided, however, that collision repair hourly labor rates, set pursuant to section 
15 of chapter 100A, shall not be included when considering programs to control costs and 
expenses under this section or section 113H.”  
SECTION 3. Within 90 days of the enactment of Section 1, the commissioner of the 
division of insurance shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of 
Sections 1 and 2, inclusive.